North Carolina, session 2025, HB838.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. SATELLITE BROADBAND GRANTS
SECTION 1.1. G.S. 143B-1373.2 is repealed.
SECTION 1.2. G.S. 143B-1374 is repealed.
SECTION 1.3.(a) The Department of Information Technology shall use funds
appropriated for the Growing Rural Economies with Access to Technology program for fixed
wireless and satellite broadband grants, established in G.S. 143B-1373.2, to award grants to
eligible entities to purchase installation materials for satellite internet service and for the
provision of satellite internet service for a period of up to one year. Installation materials and
internet service must be for the grantee's own use and not for distribution to other parties. The
Department shall prioritize grant applicants that operate in one of the 39 counties designated as
a disaster area due to Hurricane Helene. The Department may also give priority to grantees that
offer emergency services, disaster relief, educational services, or economic development.
SECTION 1.3.(b) For the purposes of this section, an eligible entity is one of the
following:
(1) A State agency.
(2) A local government entity.
(3) An internet service provider.
(4) A nonprofit organization.

PART II. REPURPOSE BROADBAND FUNDING FOR DISASTER RELIEF FUNDING
SECTION 2.1.(a) The Department of Information Technology may provide
emergency funding to communications service providers, as that term is defined in Section
38.10(j) of S.L. 2021-180, to rebuild, repair, replace, and harden broadband infrastructure
damaged by Hurricane Helene, including reimbursement of costs already incurred for rebuilding,
repairing, replacing, and hardening broadband infrastructure, provided that all of the following
apply:
(1) An applicant for funding under this section shall only be permitted to recover
costs that are not subject to reimbursement from another source of external
funding, including insurance.
*H838-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(2) The Department may cap reimbursement at a portion of the costs incurred
based upon evaluation of considerations such as the number of applications
anticipated compared to funds available.
(3) Priority shall be given to restoration of broadband service.
SECTION 2.1.(b) The Department may use up to fifty million dollars ($50,000,000)
of the funds available from the Broadband Make Ready Accelerator appropriation in S.L.
2021-180. Funds shall be used in compliance with applicable federal guidelines associated with
the use of federal funds. The Department may use its emergency procurement authority provided
in 09 NCAC 06B .1302 to procure any goods or services in accordance with this section and shall
document the request for funding, the emergency situation or need, the area to be served, and the
community's need for the procurement.

PART III. CHANGES TO THE BROADBAND POLE REPLACEMENT PROGRAM
SECTION 3.1. Section 38.10 of S.L. 2021-180 reads as rewritten:
"BROADBAND ACCELERATION
…
"SECTION 38.10.(b) The Broadband Pole Replacement Program (hereinafter "Program")
is hereby established for the purpose of speeding and facilitating the deployment of broadband
service to individuals, businesses, agricultural operations, and community access points in
unserved areas by reimbursing a portion of eligible pole replacement costs incurred by
communications service providers. A communications service provider who pays or incurs the
costs of removing and replacing an existing pole pole, or placing facilities underground to better
protect the critical infrastructure from natural disasters, in connection with a qualified project
may apply to the Department for reimbursement in an amount equal to fifty percent (50%) of
eligible pole replacement costs paid or incurred by the applicant or ten thousand dollars
($10,000), whichever is less, for each pole replaced.replaced or, in the case of placing facilities
underground, fifty percent (50%) of such costs.
…
"SECTION 38.10.(g) A pole owner shall promptly review a request for access, perform
surveys, provide estimates and final invoices, and complete, or require the completion by other
attaching entities of, any make-ready work necessary for purposes of offering broadband service
in an unserved area. A pole owner shall provide a good-faith estimate for any make-ready costs
to the communications service provider within 60 days after receipt of a complete application for
access. If requested by the communications service provider, the pole owner shall provide
accompanying documentation indicating the basis of all estimated fees or other charges,
including, but not limited to, administrative costs, that form the basis of its estimate. A good-faith
estimate shall remain valid for 14 days. To accept a good-faith estimate, a communications
service provider must provide the pole owner with written acceptance and payment of the
good-faith estimate. Make-ready work shall be conditioned upon payment of the good-faith
estimate and shall be completed within a reasonable time frame mutually agreed to by the
communications service provider and the pole owner. A pole owner may treat multiple requests
from a single communications service provider as one application for access when the requests
are filed within 90 days of one another. A pole owner may deviate from the time limits specified
in this subsection during performance of make-ready work for good and sufficient cause that
renders it infeasible to complete make-ready work within the time limits specified in this
subsection. Any deviation from the time limits specified in this subsection shall extend for a
period no longer than necessary. A communications service provider shall promptly be notified,
in writing, of the reason for a deviation and the new completion date estimate. A communications
service provider shall provide notice, in writing, to the pole owner no later than 14 days after
attaching equipment to a pole in an unserved area. This subsection shall not apply to poles owned
by a utility.
Page 2 House Bill 838-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
"SECTION 38.10.(h) A party subject to a dispute arising under subsection (g) of this section
may invoke the dispute procedures authorized in G.S. 62-350 in the same manner as a party
seeking resolution of a dispute under G.S. 62-350(c), and the Utilities Commission shall issue a
final order resolving the dispute within 120 days of the date the proceedings were initiated;
provided, however, the Commission may extend the time for issuance of a final order for good
cause and with the agreement of all parties. In such a dispute, the Commission shall apply the
provisions of this section notwithstanding any contrary provisions of any existing agreement.
This subsection shall not apply to poles owned by a utility.
"SECTION 38.10.(i) No later than 60 days after the date funds are appropriated to the
Program special fund, and on a quarterly basis thereafter, the Department shall maintain and
publish on its website all of the following:
(1) The number of applications for reimbursement received, processed, and
rejected, including the reasons applications were rejected.
(2) The amount of each reimbursement, the total number of reimbursements, and
the status of any pending reimbursements.
(3) The estimated remaining balance in the Program special fund.
"SECTION 38.10.(j) The following definitions apply in this section:
…
(4) Eligible pole replacement cost. – The actual and reasonable costs paid or
incurred by a party after June 1, 2021, to (i) remove and replace a pole,
including the amount of any expenditures to remove and dispose of the
existing pole, purchase and install a replacement pole, and transfer any
existing facilities to the new pole. pole or (ii) place facilities, including lines,
conduit, and related equipment, underground to better protect the critical
infrastructure from natural disaster. The term includes costs paid or incurred
by the party responsible for the costs of a pole replacement to reimburse the
party that performs the pole replacement. The term does not include costs that
the party incurs initially that have been reimbursed to the party by another
party ultimately responsible for the costs.
(5) Pole. – Any pole used, wholly or partly, for any wire communications or
electric distribution, irrespective of who owns or operates the pole.pole,
including poles owned by a utility.
(6) Pole owner. – A city or cooperatively organized entity that owns utility poles.
(7) Qualified project. – A project undertaken by a communications service
provider that is not affiliated with a pole owner seeking to provide or, due to
natural disaster or other force majeure event, restore, temporarily or
permanently, qualifying internet access service on a retail basis to one or more
households, businesses, agricultural operations, or community access points
in an unserved or underserved area. The project may be affiliated with a
cooperatively organized entity that owns utility poles but shall not be affiliated
with a city that owns utility poles. A pole owner whose affiliate seeks
reimbursement for a qualified project shall not pass through the costs for
which reimbursement is sought to unaffiliated communications service
providers and shall schedule and perform all work in a nondiscriminatory
fashion.
…
(9) Unserved area. – An area in which, according to the most recent map of fixed
broadband internet access service made available by the Federal
Communications Commission, fixed, terrestrial broadband service at speeds
of at least 25 megabits per second download and at least 3 megabits per second
upload is unavailable at the time the communications service provider
House Bill 838-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
requests access. An unserved area also includes an area that was previously
served but has become unserved due to damage or destruction by a natural
disaster. A pole or underground installation shall be presumed to be located in
an unserved area if the pole is located in an area that is the subject of a federal
or State grant to deploy broadband service, the conditions of which limit the
availability of a grant to unserved areas.areas or, in the case of a damaged or
destroyed facility, was in such an area when the facility was originally
constructed.
(10) Utility. – As defined by 47 U.S.C. § 224.
…."
SECTION 3.2. This Part is effective when it becomes law. Funds encumbered for
expenses incurred under this Part as of June 1, 2021, prior to the effective date of this Part shall
remain eligible for reimbursement.

PART IV. FUNDING FLEXIBILITY
SECTION 4.1. Section 38.15 of S.L. 2021-180, as enacted by Section 16.1(a) of
S.L. 2022-6, reads as rewritten:
"SECTION 38.15. Except as otherwise provided, provided and after the intent of the original
appropriation has been satisfied to the extent practicable, the Department of Information
Technology shall have flexibility to transfer funding between the programs outlined in Section
38.4, Section 38.5, and Section 38.6 38.6, and Sections 38.10(b) through (k) of this act, so long
as the total allocations for the programs remain the same.act."

PART V. LIFELINE SERVICE PROVIDERS
SECTION 5.1. Article 3 of Chapter 62 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 62-30.1. Designating telecommunications carriers; rules.
(a) Notwithstanding G.S. 62-3(23)j. or G.S. 62-30, the Utilities Commission may, solely
upon petition of any provider or reseller of mobile radio communications service, designate the
petitioning provider or reseller of mobile radio communications service as an eligible
telecommunications carrier pursuant to 47 C.F.R. § 54.201 for purposes of providing Lifeline
service. The Commission may adopt rules to effectuate the purposes of this section.
(b) Nothing in this section shall confer upon the Utilities Commission any regulatory
jurisdiction over providers or resellers of mobile radio communications service that have been
previously designated as eligible telecommunications carriers for purposes of providing Lifeline
service prior to the enactment of this section."

PART VI. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 6.1. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 4 House Bill 838-First Edition